Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8391.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-38-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-38 entitled "Inspection
of Motor Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-38-4. Director of department of revenue to require periodic inspection.
(a)(1) The director of revenue shall at least once each year, but not more frequently than
twice each year, or on the schedule defined pursuant to chapter 47.1 of this title require that every
vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer registered in this state or upon a retail seller’s premise,
be inspected and that an official certificate of inspection and approval be obtained for the vehicle,
provided, that the director of revenue shall require the first inspection of any new motor vehicle
within two (2) years from the date of purchase or before the vehicle accumulates twenty-four
thousand (24,000) miles whichever occurs first. After this first inspection, all motor vehicles except
motorcycles, registered with a gross weight of eight thousand five hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.) or
less, shall not require a further inspection for emission and safety items until the motor vehicles are
at least twenty (20) years old. Motor vehicles that are more than twenty (20) years old shall be
inspected for emissions and safety items biennially.
(2) The inspections shall be made and the certificates obtained with respect to the
mechanism, brakes, and equipment of the vehicle as shall be designated by the director of
department of revenue.
(3) The director of the department of revenue is authorized to make necessary rules and
regulations for the administration and enforcement of this chapter including, but not limited to,

upgraded standards of operation and standards for mechanical testing equipment, and to designate
any period or periods of time during which sellers at retail and owners of any vehicles, subject to
this chapter, shall display upon the vehicles certificates of inspection and approval, or shall produce
these certificates upon demand of any proper officer or employee of the department of revenue
designated by the director of the department of revenue. In addition, the director shall require each
inspection facility to file a copy of their active garage keeper’s legal liability insurance policy and
maintain a minimum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) liability coverage. Said coverage
shall be purchased for the purpose of insuring against any damage sustained to a vehicle while
under the control of the inspection facility.
(b) The director of the department of revenue may authorize the acceptance in this state of
a certificate of inspection and approval issued in another state having an inspection law similar to
this chapter, and may extend the time within which a certificate shall be obtained.
(c) The director of the department of revenue, or the director’s designee, may suspend the
registration of any vehicle which he or she determines is in such unsafe condition as to constitute
a menace to safety, or which, after notice and demand, is not equipped as required in this chapter
or for which a required certificate of inspection and approval has not been obtained.
(d) The director of the department of revenue shall provide for a staggered inspection
system by regulations.
(e) Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006222
========
LC006222 - Page 2 of 3